Florida, session 2026, SB1314.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 461.0182, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 461.0182âInterstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact; 25 public records and meetings exemptions.â 26 (1)âA podiatric physicianâs personal identifying 27 information, other than the podiatric physicianâs name, 28 licensure status, and licensure number, obtained from the 29 coordinated information system, as described in Art. VIII of s. 30 461.0181, and held by the department or the board is exempt from 31 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution 32 unless the state that originally reported the information to the 33 coordinated information system authorizes the disclosure of such 34 information by law. If disclosure is so authorized, such 35 information may be disclosed only to the extent authorized by 36 the law of the reporting state. 37 (2)(a)âA meeting or portion of a meeting of the Interstate 38 Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact Commission, established in 39 Art. XI of s. 461.0181, at which the commission must discuss 40 certain sensitive and confidential matters as specified in Art. 41 XI of s. 461.1081, is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. 42 I of the State Constitution. 43 (b)âRecordings, minutes, and records generated during an 44 exempt meeting or portion of such a meeting are exempt from s. 45 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 46 (3)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 47 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 48 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 49 through reenactment by the Legislature. 50 Section 2.â(1) The Legislature finds that it is a public 51 necessity that a podiatric physicianâs personal identifying 52 information, other than the podiatric physicianâs name, 53 licensure status, or licensure number, obtained from the 54 coordinated information system, as described in Article VIII of 55 s. 461.0181, Florida Statutes, and held by the Department of 56 Health or the Board of Podiatric Medicine be made exempt from s. 57 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 58 State Constitution. Protection of such information is required 59 under the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact, which 60 a state must adopt in order to become a member state of the 61 compact. Without the public records exemption, this state will 62 be unable to effectively implement and administer the compact. 63 (2)(a)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 64 that any meeting of the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure 65 Compact Commission or the executive committee or other committee 66 of the commission held as provided in s. 461.0181, Florida 67 Statutes, in which matters specifically exempted from disclosure 68 by federal or state law are discussed be made exempt from s. 69 286.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State 70 Constitution. 71 (b)âThe Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact 72 requires the closure of any meeting, or any portion of a 73 meeting, of the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact 74 Commission if the commission determines by a two-thirds vote 75 that the commission must discuss certain sensitive and 76 confidential matters as specified in Article XI of s. 461.1081, 77 Florida Statutes. In the absence of a public meetings exemption, 78 this state would be prohibited from becoming a member state of 79 the compact. 80 (3)âThe Legislature also finds that it is a public 81 necessity that the recordings, minutes, and records generated 82 during a meeting held as provided in s. 461.0181, Florida 83 Statutes, which is exempt from public meetings requirements be 84 made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 85 Article I of the State Constitution. Release of such information 86 would negate the public meetings exemption. As such, the 87 Legislature finds that the public records exemption is a public 88 necessity. 89 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 90 SB ___ or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 91 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 92 thereof and becomes a law.